Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

25.5-4-101. Short title.

This article and articles 5 and 6 of this title shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act".

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1815, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-101 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-102. Legislative declaration.

It is the purpose of the "Colorado Medical Assistance Act" to promote the public health and welfare of the people of Colorado by providing, in cooperation with the federal government, medical and remedial care and services for individuals and families whose income and resources are insufficient to meet the costs of such necessary services and to assist such individuals and families to attain or retain their capabilities for independence and self-care, as contemplated by the provisions of Title XIX of the social security act. The state of Colorado and its various departments, agencies, and political subdivisions are authorized to promote and achieve these ends by any appropriate lawful means, through cooperation with and the utilization of available resources of the federal government and private individuals and organizations.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1815, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-102 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 4 and articles 5 and 6 of this title 25.5, unless the context otherwise requires:

Repealed.

(1.5) "Accountable care collaborative" means a medicaid care delivery system established pursuant to section 25.5-5-419.

"Applicant" means an individual who is seeking an eligibility determination for himself or herself under this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title through an application submission or a transfer from another agency or insurance affordability program.

(2.5)

[

Editor's note: This subsection (2.5) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

"Case management agency" has the same meaning as set forth in section 25.5-6-1702 (2).

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective until July 1, 2024.] "Case management services" means services provided by community-centered boards, as defined in section 25.5-10-202; comprehensive and essential behavioral health safety net providers, as defined in section 27-50-101; and community mental health centers and community mental health clinics, as defined in section 27-66-101, to assist persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as defined in section 25.5-10-202, and persons with mental health disorders, as defined in section 27-65-102, by case management agencies, as defined in section 25.5-6-303 (5), providing case management services, as defined in sections 25.5-6-104 (2)(b) and 25.5-6-303 (6), to persons with a disability, persons who are elderly or blind, and long-term care clients, in gaining access to needed medical, social, educational, and other services.

(3)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

"Case management services" means services provided by case management agencies and comprehensive community behavioral health providers, as defined in section 27-50-101, to assist persons in gaining access to needed medical, social, educational, and other services.

"Categorically needy" means those persons who are eligible for medical assistance under this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title due to their eligibility for one or more of the federal categories of public assistance. A person may be categorically needy and eligible for medical assistance under mandatory provisions as provided under section 25.5-5-101 or may be categorically needy under optional provisions as provided under section 25.5-5-201.

"Clinic services" means those services as defined in section 25.5-5-301.

(5.5) "Dementia diseases and related disabilities" has the same meaning set forth in section 25-1-502 (2.5).

"Essential person" means a person who meets the requirements of section 26-2-103 (5), C.R.S.

"Home health services" is synonymous with "home health care" and includes the following services provided to an eligible person through a certified home health agency, pursuant to a home health plan of care:

Nursing services;

Home health aide services;

Provision of medical supplies, equipment, and appliances suitable for use in the home;

Physical therapy, occupational therapy, or speech and hearing therapy.

"Hospice care" means services provided by a public agency or private organization, or any subdivision thereof, which entity shall be known as a hospice and shall be primarily engaged in providing care to an individual for whom a certified medical prognosis has been made indicating a life expectancy of six months or less and who has elected to receive such care in lieu of other medical benefits available under this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title.

"Intermediate nursing facility for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities" means a tax-supported, state-administered intermediate nursing facility, or a distinct part of such facility, which meets the state nursing home licensing standards set forth in section 25-1.5-103 (1)(a)(I), C.R.S., and the requirements in 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396d and which:

Is maintained primarily to provide health-related care on a regular basis for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, as defined in section 27-10.5-102 (11), C.R.S., and section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S., who do not require the degree of services and supports that a hospital or skilled nursing facility can provide but who, because of their mental or physical condition, require care and services above the level of room and board, which can be made available only through institutional facilities; and

May provide care which includes but is not limited to moderate assistance or therapy functions; occasional direction, supervision, or therapy; moderate assistance or therapy for loss of mobility; routine, nonskilled nursing services; and monitoring of the drug regimen.

"Lawfully residing" means an individual who is not a citizen or national of the United States and who was lawfully admitted to the United States by the immigration and naturalization service, or any successor agency, as an actual or prospective permanent resident or whose extended physical presence in the United States is known to and allowed by the immigration and naturalization service, or any successor agency.

"Liable" or "liability" means the legal liability of a third party, either by reason of judgment, settlement, compromise, or contract, as the result of negligent acts or other wrongful acts or otherwise for all or any part of the medical cost of an injury, a disease, or the disability of an applicant for or recipient of medical assistance.

"Managed care system" means a health-care system organized to manage costs, utilization, and quality. The statewide managed care system provides for the delivery of health benefits and additional services through contracted arrangements between state medicaid agencies and MCEs.

"Medical assistance" means payment on behalf of recipients eligible for and enrolled in the program established in articles 4, 5, and 6 of this title, which is funded through Title XIX of the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396u-1, to enrolled providers under the state medical assistance program of medical care, services, goods, and devices rendered or provided to recipients under this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title, and other related payments, pursuant to this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title and the rules of the state department.

(13.5) "Modified adjusted gross income" or "MAGI" means an amount of income, as determined pursuant to section 1902 (e)(14) of the federal "Social Security Act", that is used to establish eligibility for medical assistance.

"Nursing facility" means a facility, or a distinct part of a facility, that meets the state nursing home licensing standards in section 25-1.5-103 (1)(a)(I), is maintained primarily for the care and treatment of inpatients under the direction of a physician, and meets the requirements in 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396r for certification as a qualified provider of nursing facility services. The patients in such a facility require supportive, therapeutic, or compensating services and the availability of a licensed nurse for observation or treatment on a twenty-four-hour basis. Nursing care may include terminal care; extensive assistance or therapy in the activities of daily living; continual direction, supervision, or therapy; extensive assistance or therapy for loss of mobility; nursing assessment and services that involve assessment of the total needs of the patient, planning of patient care, and observing, monitoring, and recording the patient's response to treatment; and monitoring, observing, and evaluating the drug regimen. "Nursing facility" includes private, nonprofit, or proprietary intermediate nursing facilities for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

"Overpayment" means the amount paid by an agency administering the medical assistance program to an enrolled provider under the state medical assistance program participating in the program, which amount is in excess of the amount that is allowable for services furnished and which is required by Title XIX of the social security act to be refunded to the appropriate medicaid agencies.

"Patient personal needs trust fund" means any fund or account established by the nursing care facility or intermediate care facility or its agents, employees, or designees to manage the personal needs funds of the facility's patients.

"Personal needs funds" means moneys received by any person admitted to a nursing care facility or intermediate care facility, which moneys are received by said person to purchase necessary clothing, incidentals, or other personal needs items which are not reimbursed by any federal or state program, or items of value, which moneys or items of value are in any way surrendered to the management or control of said facility, its agents, employees, or designees.

"Pilot program", as used in section 25.5-5-319, means the family planning pilot program established in section 25.5-5-319, which is carried out by all medicaid providers who provide family planning services and which shall be repealed, effective July 1 five years after the issuance of the federal waiver or July 1 in the year in which the waiver is terminated, whichever occurs first.

"Provider" means any person, public or private institution, agency, or business concern providing medical care, services, or goods authorized under this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title and holding, where applicable, a current valid license or certificate to provide such services or to dispense such goods and enrolled under the state medical assistance program. These services must be provided and goods must be dispensed only if performed, referred, or ordered by a doctor of medicine or a doctor of osteopathy. Services of dentists, podiatrists, and optometrists or services provided by a school district under section 25.5-5-318 need not be referred or ordered by a doctor of medicine or a doctor of osteopathy.

"Provider" includes a laboratory certified under the federal "Clinical Laboratories Improvement Act of 1967", as amended, 42 U.S.C. sec. 263a, to perform high complexity testing.

(19.5) "Psychiatric residential treatment facility" means a facility that is licensed as a residential child care facility, as defined in section 26-6-903, that is not a hospital, and that provides inpatient psychiatric services for individuals who are less than twenty-one years of age under the direction of a physician licensed pursuant to article 240 of title 12, and that meets any other requirement established in rule by the state board.

"Qualified alien" shall have the meaning ascribed to that term in section 431 (b) of the federal "Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996", Public Law 104-193, as amended.

"Recipient" means any person who has been determined eligible to receive benefits under this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title, whose need for medical care has been professionally established, and for whose care less than full payment is available through the legal obligation of a contractor, public or private, to pay for or provide such care.

"Recovery" or "amount recovered" means the amount payable to the applicant or recipient or his heirs, assigns, or legal representatives as the result of any liability of a third party.

"Rehabilitative services" means any medical or remedial services recommended by a physician which may reduce physical or mental disability and which may improve functional level.

"Resident" means any individual who is living, other than temporarily, within the state. "Resident" includes any unemancipated child whose parent, or other person entitled to custody, lives within the state. The state board shall adopt rules for making this determination. Temporary absences from the state shall not cause an individual to lose his status as a resident of this state.

"Social security act" means the federal "Social Security Act" and amendments thereto.

(25.5) "State university teaching hospital" means a hospital licensed or certified pursuant to section 25-1.5-103 (1)(a), C.R.S.:

That provides supervised teaching experiences to graduate medical school interns and residents enrolled in a state institution of higher education as defined in section 23-18-102 (10), C.R.S.; and

In which more than fifty percent of its credentialed physicians are members of the faculty at a state institution of higher education as defined in section 23-18-102 (10), C.R.S.

(25.7) "Telemedicine" means the delivery of medical and health-care services and any diagnosis, consultation, or treatment using interactive audio, interactive video, or interactive data communication.

"Third party" means an individual, institution, corporation, or public or private agency which is or may be liable to pay all or any part of the medical cost of an injury, a disease, or the disability of an applicant for or recipient of medical assistance.

"Title XIX" means Title XIX of the social security act, as amended, administered by the federal department of health and human services, or any successor agency, and includes amendments thereto and other federal social security laws replacing said title, in whole or in part.

"Transitional medicaid" means the medical assistance provided to recipients eligible pursuant to section 25.5-5-101 (1)(b).

Source:

L. 2006:

(19.5) added, p. 1202, § 1, effective May 26; entire article added with relocations, p. 1815, § 7, effective July 1; (3) amended, p. 1389, § 18, effective August 7.

L. 2007:

(19.5) amended, p. 2043, § 74, effective June 1.

L. 2008:

(25.5) added, p. 1184, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 2010:

(3) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 800, § 65, effective April 29.

L. 2011:

(10) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1168, § 65, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

(3), IP(9), and (9)(a) amended, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1808, § 44, effective March 1.

L. 2014:

(1) repealed, (2) amended, and (13.5) added, (SB 14-067), ch. 12, p. 109, § 1, effective February 27.

L. 2016:

(19.5) amended, (SB 16-189), ch. 210, p. 773, § 67, effective June 6.

L. 2017:

IP(1) and (14) amended, (HB 17-1046), ch. 50, p. 159, § 13, effective March 16; IP amended and (1.5) added, (HB 17-1353), ch. 231, p. 895, § 1, effective May 23; IP and (3) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1327, § 198, effective May 25; IP and IP(7) amended, (SB 17-091), ch. 321, p. 1731, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

(5.5) added, (HB 18-1091), ch. 74, p. 642, § 2, effective August 8; (12) amended, (HB 18-1431), ch. 313, p. 1892, § 9, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(19.5) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1707, § 177, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(2.5) added and (3) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 331, § 23, effective July 1, 2024; (25.7) added, (HB 21-1190), ch. 152, p. 875, § 3, effective May 18.

L. 2022:

(10) amended, (HB 22-1289), ch. 399, p. 2841, § 11, effective June 7; (3) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1511, § 66, effective July 1; (19.5) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 848, § 75, effective July 1; (3) amended, (HB 22-1256), ch. 451, p. 3239, § 53, effective August 10; (3) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1593, § 232, effective July 1, 2024.

25.5-4-104. Program of medical assistance - single state agency.

The state department, by rules, shall establish a program of medical assistance to provide necessary medical care for the categorically needy. The state department is hereby designated as the single state agency to administer such program in accordance with Title XIX and this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title. Such program shall not be required to furnish recipients under sixty-five years of age the benefits that are provided to recipients sixty-five years of age and over under Title XVIII of the social security act; but said program shall otherwise be uniform to the extent required by Title XIX of the social security act.

The state department may review any decision of a county department and may consider any application upon which a decision has not been made by the county department within a reasonable time to determine the propriety of the action or failure to take timely action on an application for medical assistance. The state department shall make such additional investigation as it deems necessary and shall, after giving the county department an opportunity to rebut any findings or conclusions of the state department that the action or delay in taking action was a violation of or contrary to state department rules, make such decision as to the granting of medical benefits and the amount thereof as in its opinion is justifiable pursuant to the provisions of this article and articles 5 and 6 of this title and the rules of the state department. Applicants or recipients affected by such decisions of the state department, upon request, shall be given reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair hearing by the state department.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1819, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-104 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-105. Federal requirements under Title XIX.

Nothing in this article or articles 5 and 6 of this title shall prevent the state department from complying with federal requirements for a program of medical assistance in order for the state of Colorado to qualify for federal funds under Title XIX of the social security act and to maintain a program within the limits of available appropriations.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1820, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-105 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-4-106. Cooperation with federal government - grants-in-aid - cooperation with the state department of human services in delivery of services.

The state department shall be the sole state agency for administering the state plans for health and medical assistance pursuant to this title, and any other state plan relating to medical assistance that requires state action which is not specifically the responsibility of some other state department, division, section, board, commission, or committee under the provisions of federal or state law.

The state department may accept on behalf of the state of Colorado the provisions and benefits of acts of congress designed to provide funds or other property for particular medical assistance within the state, which funds or other property are designated for such purposes within the function of the state department, and may accept on behalf of the state any offers which have been or may from time to time be made of funds or other property by any persons, agencies, or entities for particular medical assistance activities within the state, which funds or other property are designated for such purposes within the function of the state department; but, unless otherwise expressly provided by law, such acceptance shall not be manifested unless and until the state department has recommended such acceptance to and received the written approval of the governor and the attorney general. Such approval shall authorize the acceptance of the funds or property in accordance with the restrictions and conditions for the purpose for which funds or property are intended.

The state treasurer is designated as ex officio custodian of all medical assistance funds received by the state from the federal government and from any other source, if the approval provided for in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) has been obtained.

The state treasurer shall hold each such fund separate and distinct from state funds and is authorized to make disbursements from such funds for the designated purpose or for administrative costs, which may be provided in such grants upon warrants issued by the state controller upon the voucher of the state department.

The state department shall cooperate with the federal department of health and human services and other federal agencies in any reasonable manner, in conformity with the laws of this state, which may be necessary to qualify for federal financial participation, including the preparation of state plans, the making of reports in such form and containing such information as any federal agency may from time to time require, and the compliance with such provisions as the federal government may from time to time find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of the reports.

The rules of the state department may include provisions to accommodate requirements of contracts entered into between the state department and the federal department of health and human services, or any successor agency, for studies of guaranteed annual income or other forms of income maintenance research projects; and for such purpose, the requirements of this title as to eligibility for medical assistance shall not apply for the term of and in accordance with the contract for such purpose.

The state department is responsible for administering the delivery of medical assistance by county departments of human or social services or any other public or private entities participating in the delivery of medical assistance pursuant to this article 4 and articles 5 and 6 of this title 25.5.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1820, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(5) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 444, § 109, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-110 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

25.5-4-107. Retaliation definition.

For purposes of any rules promulgated by the state department or state board and any action taken by the state department against any person, "retaliation" means taking any of the following actions against a recipient or someone acting on behalf of a recipient after the recipient or someone acting on behalf of the recipient files a complaint concerning services provided or not provided to the recipient:

Indicating to a recipient that the recipient cannot have an advocate, family member, or other authorized representative assist the recipient; or

An adverse action that negatively affects a recipient's level of eligibility for or receipt of services received at the time of the complaint without verification of a change in the recipient's income, resources, or health-care needs that justifies the adverse action.

No adverse action shall be taken against a recipient after a complaint has been filed until the recipient is notified of the proposed action, informed of the reason for the proposed action, and provided an opportunity to appeal the proposed action.

"Retaliation" shall not include instances where a recipient is not eligible for a service or program or where a provider documents a problem with a recipient and shares the documentation with the recipient or a third party prior to the recipient filing a complaint.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1019, § 1, effective May 25.

Editor's note:

This section was originally numbered as § 26-4-402.5 in House Bill 06-1211. Section 2 of the act provided for the renumbering and relocation of § 26-4-402.5 to this section. (See L. 2006, p. 1020.)